Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-512
Irrigable or irrigable lands, defined.

Wherever the terms irrigable or irrigable lands are used in sections 46-501 to 46-573 they shall be taken to mean privately owned agricultural lands outside the corporate limits of cities or villages, which can be benefited by the use of water for irrigation purposes and which would lie within any district established under the provisions of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(10), p. 526.